Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-719
Inappropriate tribunal.

If a petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of this state, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying documents to an appropriate tribunal of this state or another state and notify the petitioner where and when the pleading was sent.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 59;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 18.